Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-211.01
First-time homebuyer, defined.

First-time homebuyer shall mean a low-income or moderate-income person who has had no present ownership interest in his or her principal residence at any time during the three-year period ending on the date a mortgage loan financed by the authority is received.

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 15.